cs: Konstrukce vinuté pružiny: Soudková (úlková); Kuželová; Dvoustupňová; Lineární; Očko (pig-tail); Progresivní; Čtvercový konec; Tangenciální konec; Proměnné stoupání; Jiná
nb: Spiralfjærdesign: Tønne (bikube); Konisk; Dobbel rate; Lineær rate; Grisehaleende; Progressiv rate; Firkantet ende; Tangentiell ende; Variabel stigning; Annet
th: การออกแบบสปริงขดลวด: ทรงถัง (รังผึ้ง); ทรงกรวย; สองระดับ; อัตราคงที่; ปลายขดเข้า; อัตราก้าวหน้า; ปลายตัดเหลี่ยม; ปลายยื่นขนาน; พิตช์แบบแปรผัน; อื่นๆ
tr: Helezon yaylı tasarımı: Fıçı (arı kovanı); Konik; Çift oranlı; Doğrusal oranlı; Helezon uç; Artan oranlı; Kare uç; Teğet uç; Değişken aralıklı; Diğer
zh-TW: 螺旋彈簧設計: 鼓型 (蜂巢式); 圓錐形; 雙係數; 線性係數; 收口端 (豬尾式); 漸進係數; 方形端; 切線端; 可變節距; 其他
ja: コイルばね設計: バレル (ビーハイブ); コニカル; デュアルレート; リニアレート; ピッグテールエンド; プログレッシブレート; スクエアエンド; タンジェンシャルエンド; バリアブルピッチ; その他
pl: Konstrukcja sprężyny śrubowej: Baryłkowa; Stożkowa; Dwustopniowa; Liniowa; Ze zwężającym się zwojem skrajnym (pig-tail); Progresywna; Z płaskim zwojem skrajnym; Z zwojem stycznym; O zmiennym skoku; Inny
el: Σχεδιασμός ελικοειδούς ελατηρίου: Βαρελοειδές (κυψέλη); Κωνικό; Διπλής σκληρότητας; Γραμμικής σκληρότητας; Άκρο τύπου pig-tail; Προοδευτικής σκληρότητας; Τετράγωνο άκρο; Εφαπτομενικό άκρο; Μεταβλητού βήματος; Άλλο
it: Design della molla elicoidale: A barile (ad alveare); Conica; A doppia costante; A costante lineare; Estremità a codino; A costante progressiva; Estremità quadrata; Estremità tangenziale; A passo variabile; Altro
pt-BR: Projeto da mola helicoidal: Barril (colmeia); Cônica; Constante dupla; Constante linear; Extremidade pig-tail; Constante progressiva; Extremidade quadrada; Extremidade tangencial; Passo variável; Outros
fr: Conception du ressort hélicoïdal: Tonneau (ruche); Conique; Double tarage; Tarage linéaire; Extrémité en queue de cochon; Tarage progressif; Extrémité carrée; Extrémité tangentielle; Pas variable; Autre
hr-HR: Dizajn spiralne opruge: Bačvasta (košnica); Konusna; Dvostruka stopa; Linearna stopa; Suženi kraj; Progresivna stopa; Kvadratni kraj; Tangencijalni kraj; Promjenjivi uspon; Ostalo
zh-CN: 螺旋弹簧设计: 桶形（蜂窝状）; 圆锥形; 双速率; 线性速率; 猪尾状末端; 渐进速率; 方形末端; 相切末端; 变节距; 其他
de: Bauart der Schraubenfeder: Tonnenform (Bienenkorb); Konisch; Dual-Rate; Lineare Kennlinie; Pigtail-Ende; Progressive Kennlinie; Quadratisches Ende; Tangentiales Ende; Variable Steigung; Andere
fi: Lämmitysvastuksen rakenne: Tynnyri (mehiläispesä); Kartio; Kaksivaiheinen; Lineaarinen; Pigtail-pää; Progressiivinen; Tasainen pää; Tangentiaalinen pää; Vaihteleva nousu; Muu
sl-SI: Zasnova vijačne vzmeti: Sodčkasta (čebelnjak); Stožčasta; Z dvojno stopnjo trdote; Z linearno stopnjo trdote; Pigtail zaključek; S progresivno stopnjo trdote; S ploskim koncem; S tangencialnim koncem; S spremenljivim korakom; Drugo
sv: Spiralfjäderdesign: Tunna (bikupa); Konisk; Dubbel fjädringskonstant; Linjär fjädringskonstant; Pigtail-ände; Progressiv fjädringskonstant; Kvadratisk ände; Tangentiell ände; Variabel stigning; Övrigt
nl: Spiraalveer ontwerp: Tonvormig; Conisch; Dual-rate; Lineair; Pigtail-uiteinde; Progressief; Haaks uiteinde; Tangentiaal uiteinde; Variabele spoed; Overig
ru: Конструкция винтовой пружины: Бочкообразная (улей); Коническая; Двухступенчатая жесткость; Линейная жесткость; С концами типа "поросячий хвостик"; Прогрессивная жесткость; С плоскими (квадратными) концами; С тангенциальными концами; С переменным шагом; Другое
da: Design af spiralfjeder: Tøndeformet (bikube); Konisk; Dobbelt rate; Lineær rate; Pig-tail-ende; Progressiv rate; Firkantet ende; Tangential ende; Variabel pitch; Andet
bg-BG: Конструкция на спиралната пружина: Бъчвовидна (кошер); Конусовидна; Двойнодействаща; С линейна характеристика; Със спираловиден край; С прогресивна характеристика; С квадратен край; С тангенциален край; С променлива стъпка; Други
ro-RO: Designul arcului elicoidal: Butoi (stup); Conic; Cu rată dublă; Cu rată liniară; Capăt tip coadă de porc; Cu rată progresivă; Capăt pătrat; Capăt tangențial; Pas variabil; Altele
lt-LT: Spiralinės spyruoklės konstrukcija: Statinės („avilio“) formos; Kūginis; Dvigubo standumo; Tiesinio standumo; Kraštai su kilpomis; Progresyvaus standumo; Kvadratinis galas; Tangentinis galas; Kintamo žingsnio; Kita
pt-PT: Design de mola helicoidal: Barris (colmeia); Cónico; Taxa dupla; Taxa linear; Extremidade em cauda de porco; Taxa progressiva; Extremidade quadrada; Extremidade tangencial; Passo variável; Outro
sk-SK: Dizajn vinutej pružiny: Súdková (včelí úľ); Kužeľová; S dvojitou charakteristikou; S lineárnou charakteristikou; S ukončením typu pig-tail; S progresívnou charakteristikou; So štvorcovým ukončením; S tangenciálnym ukončením; S premenlivým stúpaním; Iné
vi: Thiết kế lò xo cuộn: Hình thùng (tổ ong); Hình nón; Tốc độ kép; Tốc độ tuyến tính; Đầu đuôi lợn; Tốc độ tiến triển; Đầu vuông; Đầu tiếp tuyến; Bước xoắn biến thiên; Khác
en: Coil spring design: Barrel (beehive); Conical; Dual rate; Linear rate; Pig-tail end; Progressive rate; Square end; Tangential end; Variable pitch; Other
ko: 코일 스프링 설계: 배럴(비하이브); 원뿔형; 듀얼 레이트; 리니어 레이트; 피그테일 엔드; 프로그레시브 레이트; 스퀘어 엔드; 탄젠셜 엔드; 가변 피치; 기타
hu: Tekercsrugó kialakítása: Hordó (méhkas); Kúpos; Kétfokozatú; Lineáris; Szűkített végű (pig-tail); Progresszív; Laposra köszörült végű (square); Érintőleges végű; Változó menetemelkedésű; Egyéb
es: Diseño del resorte helicoidal: Barril (colmena); Cónico; Doble tasa; Tasa lineal; Extremo tipo cola de cerdo; Tasa progresiva; Extremo cuadrado; Extremo tangencial; Paso variable; Otro